test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-xaradTS_gt-norm.yaml
# NB! Following stem-final modifications take place in AccPl stem: ва -> би, ка -> ци, га -> зи
# # +Use/SpellNoSugg
  Noun - харад: # Noun 'house /(fin) talo' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi ə→o/
     харад+N+Sg+Nom: харад
     харад+N+Sg+Acc: харадмʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Gen: харадʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Dat: харданʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Loc: хардахана
     харад+N+Sg+Abl: хардахад
     харад+N+Sg+Pros: хардувна
     харад+N+Du+Nom: хардахаʼ
     харад+N+Du+Acc: хардахаʼ
     харад+N+Du+Gen: хардахаʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom: харадˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Acc: хардо
     харад+N+Pl+Gen: хардоˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Dat: хардахаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Loc: хардахаˮна
     харад+N+Pl+Abl: хардахат
     харад+N+Pl+Pros: хардоˮмна
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [хардав, хардув]
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [хардав, хардув]
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хардан
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хардахан
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хардаханан
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хардахадан
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хардувнан
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: хардахаюн
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: хардахаюн
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: хардахаюн
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: хардон
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: хардон
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хардоˮн
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: хардахаˮн
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: хардахаˮнан
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: хардахатан
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: хардоˮмнан
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хардар
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хардамд
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: харданд
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хардаханд
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хардахананд
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хардахаданд
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хардувнанд
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хардахаюд
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хардахаюд
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хардахают
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хардод
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хардод
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хардот
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хардахат
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хардахаˮнат
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хардахатат
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хардоˮмнат
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хардада
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хардамда
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: харданда
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хардаханда
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хардахананда
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хардахаданда
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хардувнанда
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хардахаюда
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хардахаюда
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хардахаюта
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хардода
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хардода
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хардота
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хардахата
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хардахаˮната
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хардахатата
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хардоˮмната
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хардамиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: хардами # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хардамиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: хардами # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: харданиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: хардани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хардаханиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: хардахани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хардахананиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хардаханани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хардахаданиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хардахадани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хардувнаниʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хардувнани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хардахаюниʼ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: хардахаюни # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хардахаюниʼ
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: хардахаюни # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хардахаюниʼ
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: хардахаюни # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хардониʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: хардони # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хардониʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: хардони # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хардоˮниʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хардоˮни # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хардахаˮниʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: хардахаˮни # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хардахаˮнаниʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: хардахаˮнани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хардахатаниʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: хардахатани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хардоˮмнаниʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: хардоˮмнани # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хардариʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хардамдиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хардандиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хардахандиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хардаханандиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хардахадандиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хардувнандиʼ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хардахаюдиʼ
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хардахаюдиʼ
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хардахаютиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хардодиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хардодиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хардотиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хардахатиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хардахаˮнатиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хардахататиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хардоˮмнатиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хардадиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хардамдиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хардандиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хардахандиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хардаханандиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хардахадандиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хардувнандиʼ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хардахаюдиʼ
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хардахаюдиʼ
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хардахаютиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хардодиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хардодиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хардотиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хардахатиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хардахаˮнатиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хардахататиʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хардоˮмнатиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хардаваˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хардаваˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: харданаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хардаханаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хардахананаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хардахаданаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хардувнанаˮ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хардахаюнаˮ
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хардахаюнаˮ
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хардахаюнаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хардонаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хардонаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хардоˮнаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хардахаˮнаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хардахаˮнанаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хардахатанаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хардоˮмнанаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хардараˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хардамдаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хардандаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хардахандаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хардаханандаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хардахадандаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хардувнандаˮ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хардахаюдаˮ
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хардахаюдаˮ
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хардахаютаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хардодаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хардодаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хардотаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хардахатаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хардахаˮнатаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хардахататаˮ
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хардоˮмнатаˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хардадоʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хардамдоʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хардандоʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хардахандоʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хардаханандоʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хардахадандоʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хардувнандоʼ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хардахаюдоʼ
     харад+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хардахаюдоʼ
     харад+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хардахаютоʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хардодоʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хардодоʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хардотоʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хардахатоʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хардахаˮнатоʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хардахататоʼ
     харад+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хардоˮмнатоʼ
     харад+N+Pred+Abs: хардад
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хардадав, хардадув]
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хардадав, хардадув]
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: хардадан
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хардадар
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хардадамд
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: хардаданд
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [хардадада, хардадда]
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хардадамда
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: хардаданда
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [хардадамиʼ, хардадмиʼ]
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [хардадами, хардадми] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [хардадамиʼ, хардадмиʼ]
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [хардадами, хардадми] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [хардаданиʼ, хардадниʼ]
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [хардадани, хардадни] # +Use/SpellNoSugg
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [хардадариʼ, хардадриʼ]
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хардадамдиʼ
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хардадандиʼ
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [хардададиʼ, хардаддиʼ]
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хардадамдиʼ
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хардадандиʼ
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [хардадаваˮ, хардадваˮ]
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [хардадаваˮ, хардадваˮ]
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [хардаданаˮ, хардаднаˮ]
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [хардадараˮ, хардадраˮ]
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хардадамдаˮ
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хардадандаˮ
     харад+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [хардададоʼ, хардаддоʼ]
     харад+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: хардадамдоʼ
     харад+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: хардадандоʼ
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: хардадмʼ
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хардан
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: харад
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: харданиʼ
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хардадиʼ
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаʼ
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хардаваˮ
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хардадаˮ
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: харадˮ
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: хардадамзь
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: харданась
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардась
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: харданинзь
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хардадинзь
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардаханзь
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хардаваць
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хардадаць
     харад+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хардаць
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [хардав, хардув]
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хардар
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хардада
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хардамиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хардариʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хардадиʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хардаваˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хардараˮ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хардадоʼ
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардавась
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардарась
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардадась
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардаминзь
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардаринзь
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардадинзь
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардаваць
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардараць
     харад+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хардадонзь
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюн
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюд
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюда
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюниʼ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюдиʼ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюдиʼ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюнаˮ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюдаˮ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хардахаюдоʼ
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюнась
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюдась
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюдась
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюнинзь
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюдинзь
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюдинзь
     харад+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хардахаюнаць
